Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1412
Rules and regulations; violation; penalty.

Obedience to the rules and regulations of the dock board may be enforced in the name of the county or municipality, as the case may be, by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars or by imprisonment not exceeding thirty days; Provided, the county board shall first adopt the same by regulation or governing body of such municipality shall first adopt the same in ordinance form, as ordinances of the municipality.

Laws 1937, c. 37, § 3, p. 171;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-2003;

R.S.1943, § 18-711;

Laws 1967, c. 84, § 9, p. 265;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-711.